Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-2940
Animal Health and Disease Control Act and Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act; department; powers.

In carrying out its duties to prevent, suppress, control, and eradicate dangerous diseases the department may:

(1) Issue quarantines to any person or public or private premises within the state where an affected animal, suspected affected animal, or regulated article is or was located, and upon any animal imported into Nebraska in violation of the Animal Health and Disease Control Act, the Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act, and any importation rules or regulations until such quarantine is released by the State Veterinarian. Whenever additional animals are placed within a quarantined premises or area, such quarantine may be amended accordingly by the department. Births and death loss shall be included on inventory documentation pursuant to the quarantine;

(2) Regulate or prohibit animal or regulated article movement into, within, or through the state through quarantines, controlled movement orders, importation orders, or embargoes as deemed necessary by the State Veterinarian;

(3) Require an affected animal or suspected affected animal to be (a) euthanized, detained, slaughtered, or sold for immediate slaughter at a federally inspected slaughter establishment or (b) inspected, tested, treated, subjected to an epidemiological investigation, monitored, or vaccinated. The department may require tested animals to be identified by an official identification eartag. Costs for confinement, restraint, and furnishing the necessary assistance and facilities for such activities shall be the responsibility of the owner or custodian of the animal;

(4) Seek an emergency proclamation by the Governor in accordance with section 81-829.40 when deemed appropriate. All state agencies and political subdivisions of the state shall cooperate with the implementation of any emergency procedures and measures developed pursuant to such proclamation;

(5)(a) Access records or animals and enter any premises related to the purposes of the Animal Health and Disease Control Act or the Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act without being subject to any action for trespass or reasonable damages if reasonable care is exercised; and

(b) Obtain an inspection warrant in the manner prescribed in sections 29-830 to 29-835 if any person refuses to allow the department access or entry as authorized under this subdivision;

(6) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to enforce and effectuate the general purpose and provisions of the Animal Health and Disease Control Act, the Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act, and any other provisions the department deems necessary for carrying out its duties under such acts including:

(a) Standards for program diseases to align with USDA/APHIS/VS program standards;

(b) Provisions for maintaining a livestock disease reporting system;

(c) Procedures for establishing and maintaining accredited, certified, validated, or designated disease-free animals, herds, or flocks;

(d) In consultation with the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment and the Department of Health and Human Services, best management practices for the disposal of carcasses of dead livestock;

(e) In consultation with the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment and the University of Nebraska, operating procedures governing composting of livestock carcasses;

(f) Recommendations of where and how any available federal funds and state personnel and materials are to be allocated for the purpose of program disease activities; and

(g) Provisions for secure food supply plans to ensure the continuity of business is maintained during a foreign animal or transboundary disease outbreak;

(7) When funds are available, develop a livestock emergency response system capable of coordinating and executing a rapid response to the incursion or potential incursion of a dangerous livestock disease episode which poses a threat to the health of the state's livestock and could cause a serious economic impact on the state, international trade, or both;

(8) When funds are available, support planning for and assistance with catastrophic livestock mortality disposal, including the acquisition of equipment and supplies and securing of services, to augment preparedness for and response to a disease, natural disaster, or other emergency event resulting in catastrophic livestock mortality or euthanization;

(9) Allow animals intended for direct slaughter to move to a controlled feedlot for qualified purposes; and

(10) Approve qualified commuter herd agreements and livestock producer plans and, when appropriate, allow for exceptions to requirements by written compliance agreements.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 40;

Laws 2022, LB848, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 315.

Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act, see section 54-7,105.